Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle A. Amendment of Articles of Incorporation.

§79-4-10.01.
Authority to amend.

A corporation may amend its articles of incorporation at any time to add or change a provision that is required or permitted in the articles of incorporation as of the effective date of the amendment or to delete a provision that is not required to be contained in the articles of incorporation.

A shareholder of the corporation does not have a vested property right resulting from any provision in the articles of incorporation, including provisions relating to management, control, capital structure, dividend entitlement or purpose or duration of the corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 10.01; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

The 2000 amendment rewrote (a).

Amendment of articles of incorporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-295 through 79-11-311.

Under Miss. Const. Art. 4, § 88 a bank organized with an authorized capital stock of $35,000 may by a majority vote of its stockholders, as provided for amendments, reduce its capital stock to $25,000. Perry v. Bank of Commerce, 116 Miss. 838, 77 So. 812, 1917 Miss. LEXIS 365 (Miss. 1917).

Provision authorizing directors to fill vacancies as applicable to newly created directorships.
6 A.L.R.2d 174.

Reduction of capital stock and distribution of capital assets upon reduction.
35 A.L.R.2d 1149.

Retroactive effect of statute fixing minimum value of corporate stock shares or otherwise affecting power of corporation to change par value of existing shares.
54 A.L.R.2d 1289.

Power of corporation to change existing redemption rights of common stock shareholders.
70 A.L.R.2d 843.

Change in stock or corporate structure, or split or substitution of stock of corporation, as affecting bequest of stock.
46 A.L.R.3d 7.

18 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 96 et seq.

6 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:783 (amendment of articles of incorporation – amendment of article concerning capitalization), 74:884 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 81, 112-117.

Holmes, The revised Model Business Corporation Act and corporate law reform in Mississippi.
57 Miss. L. J. 271, August, 1987.

§79-4-10.02.
Amendment before issuance of shares.

If a corporation has not yet issued shares, its board of directors, or its incorporators, if it has no board of directors, may adopt one or more amendments to the corporation’s articles of incorporation.

HISTORY:
Former 1972 Code §79-4-10.02 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 10.02; Laws, 1988, ch. 368, § 11] renumbered as §79-4-10.05 by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 7. Former 1972 Code §79-4-10.05 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 10.05] amended and renumbered as §79-4-10.02 by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

This section, formerly appearing as § 79-4-10.05, was amended and renumbered as present § 79-4-10.02 by Laws of 2000, ch. 469, § 4. Former § 79-4-10.02 was amended and renumbered as present § 79-4-10.05 by Laws of 2000, ch. 469, § 7.

The 2000 amendment rewrote and renumbered the section.

Amendment of articles of incorporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-295 through 79-11-311.

18 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 84-99.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 179.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:894, 74:896, 74:897, 74:902.

§79-4-10.03.
Amendment by board of directors and shareholders.

If a corporation has issued shares, an amendment to the articles of incorporation shall be adopted in the following manner:

The proposed amendment must be adopted by the board of directors.

Except as provided in Sections 79-4-10.05, 79-4-10.07, and 79-4-10.08, after adopting the proposed amendment the board of directors must submit the amendment to the shareholders for their approval. The board of directors must also transmit to the shareholders a recommendation that the shareholders approve the amendment, unless the board of directors makes a determination that because of conflicts of interest or other special circumstances it should not make such a recommendation, in which case the board of directors must transmit to the shareholders the basis for that determination.

The board of directors may condition its submission of the amendment to the shareholders on any basis.

If the amendment is required to be approved by the shareholders and the approval is to be given at a meeting, the corporation must notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the meeting of shareholders at which the amendment is to be submitted for approval. The notice must state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the amendment and must contain or be accompanied by a copy of the amendment.

Unless the articles of incorporation or the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection (c), requires a greater vote or a greater number of shares to be present, approval of the amendment requires the approval of the shareholders at a meeting at which a quorum consisting of at least a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the amendment exists, and, if any class or series of shares is entitled to vote as a separate group on the amendment, except as provided in Section 79-4-10.04(c), the approval of each such separate voting group at a meeting at which a quorum of the voting group consisting of at least a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the amendment by that voting group exists.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 10.03; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

The 2000 amendment rewrote the section.

Applicability of this section to restatement of articles of incorporation, see § 79-4-10.07.

Amendment of articles of incorporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-295 through 79-11-311.

18 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 99.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Form 153.5 (complaint, petition, or declaration – stockholders’ individual action – for declaratory and injunctive relief barring amendment to Articles of Incorporation).

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 81, 112-117.

§79-4-10.04.
Voting on amendments by voting groups.

If a corporation has more than one (1) class of shares outstanding, the holders of the outstanding shares of a class are entitled to vote as a separate voting group, if shareholder voting is otherwise required by the Mississippi Business Corporation Act, on a proposed amendment to the articles of incorporation if the amendment would:

Effect an exchange or reclassification of all or part of the shares of the class into shares of another class;

Effect an exchange or reclassification, or create the right of exchange, of all or part of the shares of another class into shares of the class;

Change the rights, preferences or limitations of all or part of the shares of the class;

Change the shares of all or part of the class into a different number of shares of the same class;

Create a new class of shares having rights or preferences with respect to distributions or to dissolution that are prior or superior to the shares of the class;

Increase the rights, preferences or number of authorized shares of any class that, after giving effect to the amendment, have rights or preferences with respect to distributions or to dissolution that are prior or superior to the shares of the class;

Limit or deny an existing preemptive right of all or part of the shares of the class; or

Cancel or otherwise affect rights to distributions that have accumulated but not yet been authorized on all or part of the shares of the class.

If a proposed amendment would affect a series of a class of shares in one or more of the ways described in subsection (a), the holders of shares of that series are entitled to vote as a separate voting group on the proposed amendment.

If a proposed amendment that entitles the holders of two (2) or more classes or series of shares to vote as separate voting groups under this section would affect those two (2) or more classes or series in the same or a substantially similar way, the holders of shares of all the classes or series so affected must vote together as a single voting group on the proposed amendment, unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or required by the board of directors.

A class or series of shares is entitled to the voting rights granted by this section although the articles of incorporation provide that the shares are nonvoting shares.

The provisions of subsection (a)(6) shall not apply to preferred stock issued by a public utility subject to the provisions of the Public Utility Holding Company Act, 15 United States Code, Section 79 et seq., where the issuance of its securities is regulated by an agency of the United States.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 10.04; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

The 2000 amendment, in (a), substituted “If a corporation has more than one (1) class of shares outstanding” for “Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e),” substituted “the Mississippi Business Corporation Act” for “Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq,” and inserted “to the articles of incorporation”; deleted former (a)(1) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; deleted “designation” following “Change the” in (a)(3); substituted “prior or superior to” for “prior, superior or substantially equal to” in (a)(5) and (6); deleted “or dividends” following “distributions” and substituted “authorized” for “declared” in (a)(8); inserted “holders of” in (b); rewrote (c); and substituted “subsection (a)(6)” for “subsections (a)(1) and (a)(7)” in (e).

Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-1.01 et seq.

Applicability of voting by voting groups as provided in this section to adoption of plan of merger, see § 79-4-11.04.

Amendment of articles of incorporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-295 through 79-11-311.

The Public Utility Holding Company Act is codified as 15 USCS §§ 79 et seq.

18 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 99.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations § 74:919.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Form 153.5 (complaint, petition, or declaration – stockholders’ individual action – for declaratory and injunctive relief barring amendment to Articles of Incorporation).

18 C.J.S., Corporations § 113.

§79-4-10.05.
Amendment by board of directors.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, a corporation’s board of directors may adopt amendments to the corporation’s articles of incorporation without shareholder approval:

To extend the duration of the corporation if it was incorporated at a time when limited duration was required by law;

To delete the names and addresses of the initial directors;

To change the information required by Section 79-35-5(a);

If the corporation has only one (1) class of shares outstanding:

To change each issued and unissued authorized share of the class into a greater number of whole shares of that class; or

To increase the number of authorized shares of the class to the extent necessary to permit the issuance of shares as a share dividend;

To change the corporate name by substituting the word “corporation,” “incorporated,” “company,” “limited” or the abbreviation “corp.,” “inc.,” “co.” or “ltd.” for a similar word or abbreviation in the name, or by adding, deleting or changing a geographical attribution for the name;

To reflect a reduction in authorized shares, as a result of the operation of Section 79-4-6.31(b), when the corporation has acquired its own shares and the articles of incorporation prohibit the reissue of the acquired shares;

To delete a class of shares from the articles of incorporation, as a result of the operation of Section 79-4-6.31(b), when there are no remaining shares of the class because the corporation has acquired all shares of the class and the articles of incorporation prohibit the reissue of the acquired shares; or

To make any change expressly permitted by Section 79-4-6.02(a) or (b) to be made without shareholder approval.

HISTORY:
Former 1972 Code §79-4-10.05 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 10.05] renumbered as §79-4-10.02 by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 4. Former 1972 Code §79-4-10.02 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 10.02; Laws, 1988, ch. 368, § 11] amended and renumbered as §79-4-10.05 by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 7; Laws, 2004, ch. 495, § 7; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 31, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

This section, formerly appearing as § 79-4-10.02, was amended and renumbered as present § 79-4-10.05 by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 7.
Former § 79-4-10.05 was amended and renumbered as present § 79-4-10.02 by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 4.

The 2000 amendment rewrote and renumbered the section.

The 2004 amendment substituted “79-4-6.02(a) or (b)” for “79-4-6.02(d)” in (8).

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote (3).

Lack of authority for committees to amend articles of incorporation pursuant to this section, see § 79-4-8.25.

No necessity for action by shareholders of surviving corporation on plan of merger if articles of incorporation will not differ except for amendments enumerated in § 79-4-10.05, see § 79-4-11.04.

Amendment of articles of incorporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-295 through 79-11-311.

18 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 84-99.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 179.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:898-74:901.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Form 153.5.

18 C.J.S., Corporations § 81.

§79-4-10.06.
Articles of amendment.

After an amendment to the articles of incorporation has been adopted and approved in the manner required by the Mississippi Business Corporation Act and by the articles of incorporation, the corporation shall deliver to the Secretary of State, for filing, articles of amendment, which shall set forth:

The name of the corporation;

The text of each amendment adopted, or the information required by Section 79-4-1.20(k)(5);

If an amendment provides for an exchange, reclassification or cancellation of issued shares, provisions for implementing the amendment (if not contained in the amendment itself), which may be made dependent upon facts objectively ascertainable outside the articles of amendment in accordance with Section 79-4-1.20(k);

The date of each amendment’s adoption; and

If an amendment:

Was adopted by the incorporators or board of directors without shareholder approval, a statement that the amendment was duly approved by the incorporators or by the board of directors, as the case may be, and that shareholder approval was not required;

Required approval by the shareholders, a statement that the amendment was duly approved by the shareholders in the manner required by the Mississippi Business Corporation Act and by the articles of incorporation; or

Is being filed pursuant to Section 79-4-1.20(k)(5), a statement to that effect.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 10.06; Laws, 1993, ch. 368, § 17; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 8; Laws, 2004, ch. 495, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

The 2000 amendment rewrote the introductory paragraph; rewrote (5); and deleted former (6).

The 2004 amendment added “or the information required by Section 79-4-1.20(k)(5)” to the end of (2); added “which may be made dependent upon facts objectively ascertainable outside the articles of amendment in accordance with Section 79-4-1.20(k)” to the end of (3); added (5)(c); and made other minor changes.

Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-101 et seq.

Applicability of § 79-4-10.06 to requirements for filing certificate of restated articles of incorporation, see § 79-4-10.07.

Amendment of articles of incorporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-295 through 79-11-311.

18 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 84-99.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 179.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:877, 74:937, 74:938-74:940.

18 C.J.S., Corporations § 81.

§79-4-10.07.
Restated articles of incorporation.

A corporation’s board of directors may restate its articles of incorporation at any time, with or without shareholder approval, to consolidate all amendments into a single document.

If the restated articles include one or more new amendments that require shareholder approval, the amendments must be adopted and approved as provided in Section 79-4-10.03.

A corporation that restates its articles of incorporation shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing articles of restatement setting forth the name of the corporation and the text of the restated articles of incorporation, together with a certificate which states that the restated articles consolidate all amendments into a single document and, if a new amendment is included in the restated articles, which also includes the statements required under Section 79-4-10.06.

Duly adopted restated articles of incorporation supersede the original articles of incorporation and all amendments thereto.

The Secretary of State may certify restated articles of incorporation as the articles of incorporation currently in effect, without including the certificate information required by subsection (c).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 10.07; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

The 2000 amendment substituted “shareholder approval to consolidate all amendments into a single document” for “shareholder action” in (a); rewrote (b); deleted former (c) and (d) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; substituted “that restates” for “restating” and “which states that the restated . . .” for “setting forth” in (c); substituted “thereto” for “to them” in (d); substituted “subsection (c)” for “subsection (d)” in (e); and made minor punctuation changes throughout.

Amendment of articles of incorporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-295 through 79-11-311.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations § 74:885.

§79-4-10.08.
Amendment pursuant to reorganization.

A corporation’s articles of incorporation may be amended without action by the board of directors or shareholders to carry out a plan of reorganization ordered or decreed by a court of competent jurisdiction under the authority of a law of the United States.

The individual or individuals designated by the court shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing articles of amendment setting forth:

The name of the corporation;

The text of each amendment approved by the court;

The date of the court’s order or decree approving the articles of amendment;

The title of the reorganization proceeding in which the order or decree was entered; and

A statement that the court had jurisdiction of the proceeding under federal statute.

This section does not apply after entry of a final decree in the reorganization proceeding even though the court retains jurisdiction of the proceeding for limited purposes unrelated to consummation of the reorganization plan.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 10.08; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

The 2000 amendment substituted “the authority of a law of the United States” for “federal statute if the articles of incorporation after amendment contain only provisions required or permitted by Section 79-4-2.02” in (a); deleted former (c) and redesignated former (d) as present (c).

Amendment of articles of incorporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-295 through 79-11-311.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 2309.

19 C.J.S., Corporations § 1584.

§79-4-10.09.
Effect of amendment.

An amendment to the articles of incorporation does not affect a cause of action existing against or in favor of the corporation, a proceeding to which the corporation is a party, or the existing rights of persons other than shareholders of the corporation. An amendment changing a corporation’s name does not abate a proceeding brought by or against the corporation in its former name.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 10.09; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

The 2000 amendment inserted “the” following “An amendment to.”

Amendment of articles of incorporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-295 through 79-11-311.

Arbitrator was the proper arbitrator, and it had jurisdiction, because the arbitrator’s name change did not negate the validity of an arbitration agreement, Wells Fargo Advisors, LLC v. Runnels, 126 So.3d 137, 2013 Miss. App. LEXIS 781 (Miss. Ct. App. 2013).